Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1307.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIX-LHISTORIC BARN PRESERVATION TAX CREDITSection 1901-L. Scope of article.This article establishes the Historic Barn Preservation Tax Credit.Section 1902-L. Definitions.1234567891011121314151617181920212223 The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agrotourism." Farm-related tourism or farm-related entertainment activity that takes place on agricultural land and allows members of the general public, whether or not for a fee, to tour, explore, observe, learn about, participate in or be entertained by an aspect of agricultural production, harvesting, husbandry or rural lifestyle that occurs on the farm."Costs of rehabilitation or restoration." Costs attributed to the rehabilitation or restoration of a historic barn, including, but not limited to:(1) historic decorative elements;(2) upgrading of the structural, mechanical, electrical and plumbing systems; and(3) architectural fees and alterations to make the historic barn suitable for agricultural or agrotourism use."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Historic barn." A structure that is:(1) located within this Commonwealth;(2) used:(i) to store farm implements, hay, feed, grain or any other agricultural or horticultural products;(ii) to house poultry, livestock or other farm animals;(iii) as a milk house;(iv) for a manner directly and customarily associated with agricultural use; or(v) for a manner directly and customarily associated 20260SB1307PN1668 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with agrotourism use; and(3) at least 50 years old."Qualified taxpayer." Any natural person, corporation, business trust, limited liability company, partnership, limited liability partnership, association or any other form of legal business entity that:(1) Has not failed to file a State tax return for any taxable year and does not have an outstanding balance or unpaid taxes.(2) Owns a historic barn."Tax credit." The Historic Barn Preservation Tax Credit established under section 1903-L(a).Section 1903-L. Historic Barn Preservation Tax Credit.(a) Establishment.--The Historic Barn Preservation Tax Credit is established to encourage restoration and continued use of historic barns in this Commonwealth. The department shall administer the tax credit in accordance with this article.(b) Tax credit.--For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026, a qualified taxpayer may claim the tax credit for the costs of rehabilitation or restoration of a historic barn and may apply the tax credit against its qualified tax liability.(c) Availability.--(1) Beginning in fiscal year 2026-2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, no more than $10,000,000 in tax credits may be awarded per fiscal year in accordance with this article.(2) In addition to the amount allocated under paragraph (1), any unallocated tax credits from the preceding fiscal year may be allocated.(d) Maximum amount.--The amount of the tax credit shall be the lesser of:20260SB1307PN1668 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) 25% of the total incurred costs of rehabilitation or restoration; or(2) $100,000.(e) Availability of tax credits.--Tax credits shall be made available by the department on a first-come, first-served basis.(f) Application.--Within 120 days of the effective date of this subsection and in consultation with the following, the department shall promulgate an application process, including an application form, by which qualified taxpayers may apply for the tax credit:(1) The Department of Agriculture.(2) The Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission.(3) Other stakeholders knowledgeable in the topics of preservation of Pennsylvania's historic barns, agriculture or agrotourism.Section 1904-L. Use of tax credit.(a) Carryover.--If a qualified taxpayer cannot use the entire amount of the tax credit for the taxable year in which the tax credit was awarded, the excess tax credit may be carried over to succeeding taxable years and used as a credit against the qualified tax liability of the qualified taxpayer, never to exceed the original credit amount.(b) Carryback and refund.--A qualified taxpayer is not entitled to carry back or obtain a refund of all or a portion of an unused tax credit granted to the qualified taxpayer under this article.(c) Sale or assignment of tax credit.--A qualified taxpayer may not sell or assign a tax credit granted to the qualified taxpayer under this article.Section 1905-L. Regulations.20260SB1307PN1668 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this article.Section 1906-L. Expiration.The department may not approve an application for a tax credit under this article after December 31, 2036.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1307PN1668 - 5 - 123456